Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-247
Department; rules and regulations.

The department shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations necessary to carry out sections 44-242 to 44-247.

Laws 1979, LB 332, § 6;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 91.